Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.115

Forming, incorporating with, or investing in other entities—Limitation.

An association, alone or in conjunction with other entities, may form, incorporate, or invest in corporations or other entities, whether or not such other corporation or entity is related to the association's business. The aggregate amount of funds invested or used in the formation of corporations or other entities under this section shall not exceed ten percent of the assets of the association.

[ 1982 c 3 s 50.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.